Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-806
Losses; notice; adjustment.

Every member of such association who may sustain loss or damage shall, as soon as practicable thereafter, notify the secretary thereof, stating the amount of damage or loss claimed. The person or persons authorized by such company to adjust losses shall proceed to ascertain the amount of such loss or damage, and adjust the same.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 128, p. 464;

R.S.1913, § 3265;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. X, § 5, p. 645;

C.S.1922, § 7864;

C.S.1929, § 44-905;

R.S.1943, § 44-806.

Statutory provisions authorizing organization of assessment hail insurance company, articles of incorporation and by-laws of company, application for membership and policy issued thereon or the application if it is in fact a policy, constitute the contract. Schnell v. United Hail Ins. Co., 145 Neb. 768, 18 N.W.2d 112 (1945).

Conversation with insurance company's employee three years after loss was not proper notice. Clark v. State Farmers Ins. Co., 142 Neb. 483, 7 N.W.2d 71 (1942).